Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-933
Civil penalties; disposition.

All money collected as a civil penalty under section 68-929 or 68-930 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2005, LB 589, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2005, § 68-10,107;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 33.